Florida, session 2026, HB1451.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
44
45 Section 1. Subsection (3) is added to section 180.19,
46 Florida Statutes, to read:
47 180.19 Use by other municipalities and by individuals
48 outside corporate limits.—
49 (3)(a) A new agreement, or an extension, renewal, or
50 material amendment of an existing agreement, to provide
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1451 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1451, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
51 electric, water, natural gas, or sewer utility service by a
52 municipality to any other municipality or the owners or
53 association of owners of lots or lands outside of its corporate
54 limits or within the limits of any other municipality at retail
55 must be in writing. Such agreement may not become effective
56 before an appointed representative of the municipality that
57 provides the service or intends to provide the service, in
58 conjunction with the governing body of each municipality and
59 unincorporated area served or to be served, has participated in
60 a public meeting. Such meeting is not required to be a separate
61 public meeting, but it must be held within each municipality and
62 unincorporated area served or to be served for purposes of
63 providing information and soliciting public input on:
64 1. The nature of the services to be provided or changes to
65 the services being provided;
66 2. The rates, fees, and charges to be imposed for the
67 services provided or intended to be provided, including any
68 differential with the rates, fees, and charges imposed for the
69 same services on customers located within the boundaries of the
70 serving municipality, the basis for the differential, and the
71 length of time that the differential is expected to exist;
72 3. The extent to which revenues generated from the
73 provision of the services will be used to fund or finance
74 nonutility government functions or services; and
75 4. Any other matter deemed relevant by the parties to the
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1451 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1451, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
76 agreement.
77 (b) Rates, fees, and charges imposed for water or sewer
78 utility services provided pursuant to subsection (1) must comply
79 with s. 180.191.
80 (c) A representative of each municipality that provides
81 electric, water, natural gas, or sewer utility services pursuant
82 to subsection (1), in conjunction with the governing body of
83 each municipality and unincorporated area in which it provides
84 services, shall annually conduct a public customer meeting. Such
85 meeting is not required to be a separate public meeting, but
86 must be held within each municipality and unincorporated area
87 for purposes of soliciting public input on utility-related
88 matters, including fees, rates, charges, and services.
89 (d) As used in this subsection, the term:
90 1. "Appointed representative" means an executive-level
91 leadership employee of a municipality, or of such municipality's
92 related and separate utility authority, board, or commission,
93 specifically appointed by the governing body to serve as its
94 representative for the purposes of this subsection.
95 2. "Governing body" means:
96 a. A governing body of a municipality in which services
97 are provided or proposed to be extended; or
98 b. A board of county commissioners of a county in which
99 services are provided or proposed to be extended, if services
100 are provided or proposed to be extended in an unincorporated
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1451 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1451, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
101 area within the county.
102 Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 180.191, Florida
103 Statutes, is amended to read:
104 180.191 Limitation on rates charged consumer outside city
105 limits.—
106 (1) Any municipality within this the state operating a
107 water or sewer utility outside of the boundaries of such
108 municipality shall charge consumers outside the boundaries
109 rates, fees, and charges determined in one of the following
110 manners:
111 (a) It may charge the same rates, fees, and charges as
112 consumers inside the municipal boundaries. However, in addition
113 thereto, the municipality may add a surcharge of not more than
114 25 percent of such rates, fees, and charges to consumers outside
115 the boundaries. Fixing of such rates, fees, and charges in this
116 manner may shall not require a public hearing except as may be
117 provided for service to consumers inside the municipality.
118 (b) It may charge rates, fees, and charges that are just
119 and equitable and which are based on the same factors used in
120 fixing the rates, fees, and charges for consumers inside the
121 municipal boundaries. In addition thereto, the municipality may
122 add a surcharge not to exceed 25 percent of such rates, fees,
123 and charges for said services to consumers outside the
124 boundaries. However, the total of all Such rates, fees, and
125 charges for the services to consumers outside the boundaries may
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1451 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1451, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
126 shall not be more than 25 50 percent in excess of the rates,
127 fees, and charges total amount the municipality charges
128 consumers served within the municipality for corresponding
129 service. No Such rates, fees, and charges may not shall be fixed
130 until after a public hearing at which all of the users of the
131 water or sewer systems; owners, tenants, or occupants of
132 property served or to be served thereby; and all others
133 interested shall have an opportunity to be heard concerning the
134 proposed rates, fees, and charges. Any change or revision of
135 such rates, fees, or charges may be made in the same manner as
136 such rates, fees, or charges were originally established, but if
137 such change or revision is to be made substantially pro rata as
138 to all classes of service, both inside and outside the
139 municipality, a no hearing or notice is not shall be required.
140 (c) In addition to the rates, fees, and charges authorized
141 under this section, a municipality may continue to impose a
142 surcharge on consumers outside the municipal boundaries if the
143 surcharge was in effect before March 1, 2026, but only to the
144 extent necessary to comply with the terms of bond covenants in
145 effect as of July 1, 2024. Such surcharges must be phased out by
146 July 1, 2029, or upon the retirement, expiration, or refinancing
147 of the applicable debt obligation, whichever occurs earlier.
148 Section 3. Effective July 1, 2026, section 180.192,
149 Florida Statutes, is created to read:
150 180.192 Reporting requirements related to municipal
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1451 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1451, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
151 utility service.—
152 (1) By January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each
153 municipality that provides electric, water, natural gas, or
154 sewer utility services outside of its municipal boundaries shall
155 provide a report to the Florida Public Service Commission which
156 identifies, for each type of utility service provided by the
157 municipality:
158 (a) The number and percentage of customers that receive
159 utility services provided by the municipality at a location
160 outside the boundaries of the municipality;
161 (b) The volume and percentage of sales made to such
162 customers, and the gross revenues generated from such sales;
163 (c) Whether the rates, fees, and charges imposed on
164 customers that receive services at a location outside the
165 municipality's boundaries are different than the rates, fees,
166 and charges imposed on customers within the boundaries of the
167 municipality, and, if so, the amount and percentage of the
168 differential; and
169 (d) The percentage of revenues generated from the
170 provision of utility services that were used to fund or finance
171 nonutility government functions or services of the municipality,
172 and the percentage of the municipality's nonutility budget that
173 was funded by such revenues.
174
175 A municipality that fails to file the report required by this
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1451 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1451, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
176 subsection is subject to the penalties provided in ss. 366.095
177 and 367.161.
178 (2) By March 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
179 commission shall compile the information provided pursuant to
180 subsection (1) and submit a report containing that information
181 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of
182 the House of Representatives.
183 (3) Notwithstanding s. 367.171, the commission shall have
184 jurisdiction over all utilities identified in subsection (1) for
185 the limited purpose of enforcing the requirements of this
186 section. This section does not otherwise modify or extend the
187 authority of the commission provided by law with respect to any
188 municipal utility that is required to comply with subsection
189 (1).
190 Section 4. (1) The subject of a regional utilities
191 authority created by the Legislature through charter amendment
192 after January 1, 2023, is expressly preempted to the state.
193 (2) This section shall take effect upon this act becoming
194 a law.
195 Section 5. The Legislature finds and declares that this
196 act fulfills an important state interest.
197 Section 6. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
198 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon
199 becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 2027.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1451 -03-er